apertium-sl-es.sl.dix
    <pardef n="sla/dek__comp__sfx__adj">
	<!-- m -->
      <e>       <p><l>jši</l>          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšega</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšemu</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšega</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jši</l>          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšem</l>         <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšim</l>         <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>jša</l>          <r><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jših</l>         <r><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšima</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jša</l>          <r><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jših</l>         <r><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšima</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>jši</l>          <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jših</l>         <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšim</l>         <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jše</l>          <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jših</l>         <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšimi</l>        <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

	<!-- f -->
      <e>       <p><l>jša</l>          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jše</l>          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jši</l>          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšo</l>          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jši</l>          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšo</l>          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>jši</l>          <r><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jših</l>         <r><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšima</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jši</l>          <r><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jših</l>         <r><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšima</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>jše</l>          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jših</l>         <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšim</l>         <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jše</l>          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jših</l>         <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšimi</l>        <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

	<!-- nt -->
      <e>       <p><l>jše</l>          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšga</l>         <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšemu</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jše</l>          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšem</l>         <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšim</l>         <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>jši</l>          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jših</l>         <r><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšima</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jši</l>          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jših</l>         <r><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšima</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>jša</l>          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jših</l>         <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšim</l>         <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jša</l>          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jših</l>         <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jšimi</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


<pardef n="sla/dek__pst__adj">
         <e><p><l></l>			<r>dek<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="sla/dek__pst__sfx__adj"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sla/dek__ela__adj">
         <e><p><l></l>			<r>dek<s n="adj"/><s n="ela"/></r></p><par n="sla/dek__pst__sfx__adj"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sla/dek__sup__adj">
         <e><p><l></l>			<r>dek<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p><par n="sla/dek__comp__sfx__adj"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sla/dek__comp__adj">
         <e><p><l></l>			<r>dek<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p><par n="sla/dek__comp__sfx__adj"/></e>
</pardef>

	<e lm="sladek">         <i>sla</i><par n="sla/dek__pst__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="sladek">	 		<p><l>presla</l><r>sla</r></p><par n="sla/dek__ela__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="sladek">         <i>sla</i><par n="sla/dek__comp__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="sladek">	 		<p><l>najsla</l><r>sla</r></p><par n="sla/dek__sup__adj"/></e>
